Alabama, session 2026rs, SB149.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 16-23-3.2 is added to the Code of
Alabama 1975, to read as follows:
§16-23-3.2
(a) The State Board of Education shall establish a
Military Veteran Temporary Teaching Certificate. A Military
Veteran Temporary Teaching Certificate shall be available for
a teaching field for which the state board otherwise requires
a bachelor's degree. The department may issue a temporary
certificate pursuant to this section to any applicant who:
(1) Documents 48 months of active duty military service
with an honorable discharge or a medical separation;
(2) Submits to the state board the required application
forms and fees and satisfactorily completes a criminal history
background information check pursuant to the Alabama Child
Protection Act of 1999;
(3) Is recommended for certification by a local
superintendent of education or private K-12 school
Page 1

superintendent of education or private K-12 school
SB149 Enrolled
administrator; and
(4) Verifies compliance with all of the following
admission criteria:
a. Completion of 60 college credits with a minimum
cumulative grade point average of 2.5 on a 4.0 scale, as
evidenced by one or more accredited institutions of higher
education.
b. A passing score on the appropriate Praxis content
test of the Alabama Educator Certification Assessment Program
(AECAP).
c. Any other admission criteria established by the
State Board of Education.
(b) After receiving temporary certification, the
individual shall be assigned a mentor by the employing
superintendent for a minimum of two school years after
commencing employment, or participate in the Alabama Teacher
Mentor Program if hired by a local board of education that
participates in the program.
(c) A temporary certificate issued pursuant to this
section is valid for five school years, is limited to a
one-time issuance, and is nonrenewable.
(d) Time served as a teacher pursuant to a temporary
certificate under this section shall not be counted in
determining continued service status.
(e) Individuals who receive a temporary certificate
under this section shall not be available to receive an
emergency certificate pursuant to Section 16-23-3(f).
(f) When notifying the individual of his or her
Page 2

(f) When notifying the individual of his or her
SB149 Enrolled
temporary certificate approval, the department shall also
inform the individual of the certificate's expiration date and
provide a list of methods to complete the qualifications for a
professional certificate.
(g) The State Board of Education shall adopt rules to
implement this section.
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 3

1, 2026.
SB149 Enrolled






________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate



________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives


SB149
Senate 22-Jan-26
I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and passed
the Senate, as amended.

Patrick Harris,
Secretary.




House of Representatives
Passed: 24-Feb-26




By: Senator Woods
Page 4